District of Columbia statutes.
7-2871.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Athlete” means a person who engages in athletic activity who is 18 years old or younger.

(2)

“Athletic activity” means a program or event, including practice and competition, organized as part of a school-sponsored, interscholastic-athletic program, an athletic program sponsored by the Department of Parks and Recreation, or an athletic program under the auspices of a nonprofit or for-profit organization. The term “athletic activity” includes participation in physical education classes that are part of a school curriculum.

(3)

“Concussion” means a traumatic injury to the brain causing a change in a person’s mental status at the time of the injury, such as feeling dazed, disoriented, or confused, which may or may not involve a loss of consciousness, resulting from:

(A)

A fall;

(B)

A blow or jolt to the head or body;

(C)

The shaking or spinning of the head or body; or

(D)

The acceleration and deceleration of the head.

(4)

“School” means a public school operated under the authority of the Mayor and any charter, parochial, or private school in the District.

Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-22, § 2, 58 DCR 6506

History